Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 3. Enlargement, Consolidation, Merger and Change of Boundaries

§ 22-29-301.
Enlargement petitions.

When any voters or landowners of an area wish to join a district, they may file an enlargement petition with the county commissioners. Unless otherwise provided under this subsection, the petition for enlargement may include provisions allowing the board of district directors to be enlarged by one (1) or more positions to be filled by voters residing or located in the new area, the number of positions to be determined by the petitioners and the district directors of the existing district. Before the petition is filed with the county commissioners, it shall be approved by the directors of the affected district and by any other agency also required by the principal act to approve the petition. The petition process shall be governed by W.S.

22-29-105

through

22-29-108

. An election need not be held on an enlargement petition if the petition alleges and the county commissioners find:

All landowners and all voters, if any, within the new area and the board of directors of the district agree to the inclusion of the new area within the district.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 22, § 2.

W.S.

22-29-109

applies to the proceeding conducted by the county commissioners and the rights, powers and duties of petitioners and other persons having an interest in the proceedings. The county commissioners shall approve or disapprove the enlargement petition.

Except as provided under subsection (a) of this section, if the enlargement petition is approved, there shall be an election which shall be conducted under this act. At the enlargement election, there shall also be elected temporary directors whose terms shall expire at the next regular district director election. At the first regular election following the enlargement election, the total number of directors shall be as stated in the principal act.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2001, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “any voters or landowners” for “the voters” near the beginning, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “If there are no voters within an area proposed to be included in a district, the landowners of the area may file an enlargement petition with the county commissioners.”, and substituted “may” for “shall” in the second sentence; inserted “and all voters, if any” in (a)(i); and repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “There are no voters residing in the new area,” and made a stylistic change.

§ 22-29-302.
Merger of districts; effect.

A district may merge with another district even if formed under different principal acts, if the merger is first approved by the county commissioners and approved by the voters of each district. The districts included in the merger shall be considered joined to and absorbed into the surviving district.

If the merger is approved, the district directors and officers of the merging districts shall transfer to the directors of the surviving district all funds, property, contracts and records of the merging districts. Upon the effective date of the merger:

The surviving district shall succeed to all the property, contracts, rights and powers of the merging districts, and shall constitute and be a regularly organized district as if originally organized in the manner provided by the principal act;

Uncollected taxes, assessments or charges levied by the merging districts shall become the property of the surviving district and upon collection shall be credited to the account of the surviving district; and

The surviving district shall become liable for all the obligations, legal and contractual, of the merging districts.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 22-29-303.
Consolidation of districts; effect.

Two (2) or more districts even if formed under different principal acts may consolidate and form a new district if the consolidation is first approved by the county commissioners and approved by the voters. The districts included in the consolidation shall be considered joined into a single new district.

If the consolidation is approved, the district directors and officers of the consolidating districts shall transfer to the directors of the successor district all funds, property, contracts and records of the consolidating districts. Upon the effective date of the consolidation:

The successor district shall succeed to all the property, contracts, rights and powers of the consolidating districts, and shall constitute and be a regularly organized district as if originally organized in the manner provided by the principal act;

Uncollected taxes, assessments or charges levied by the consolidating districts shall become the property of the successor district and upon collection shall be credited to the account of the successor district; and

The successor district shall become liable for all the obligations, legal or contractual, of the consolidating districts.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 22-29-304.
Initiation of merger and consolidation; election.

The voters of two (2) or more districts may initiate proceedings to merge or consolidate districts by filing a petition with the directors of the districts to be merged or consolidated. The petition shall be circulated and jointly verified in accordance with W.S.

22-29-105

and

22-29-108

by the secretaries of the districts involved. The petition shall state the name of the surviving or successor district. If two (2) or more districts planning to merge or consolidate have been formed under two (2) different principal acts, the petition shall also state under what principal act the merged or consolidated district shall operate. The principal act under which the merged or consolidated district shall operate may be different than the principal acts governing the original districts. In addition, the petition of merger or consolidation shall set forth provisions pertaining to the composition of the board of the new district until the next district election. The board of the new district may be composed of members of the combined boards. At the next regular district election members shall elect a new board. Thereafter the merged or consolidated board shall operate with the number of directors applicable under the principal act.

Upon the district secretary certifying the petition, the directors of the districts shall order an election which shall be conducted in accordance with W.S.

22-29-113

through

22-29-117

and

22-29-305

.

Merger or consolidation may also be initiated by resolution adopted by the directors of two (2) or more districts. The resolution shall contain all the matters required to be stated in a petition to merge or consolidate. Upon the adoption of these resolutions, the directors of the district shall order an election which shall be conducted as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 22-29-305.
Specific provisions relating to enlargement, merger and consolidation elections.

The elections effecting enlargement, merger or consolidation shall be governed by the following specific rules:

For enlargement elections, the voters of both the existing district and the area to be added shall be entitled to vote;

For merger and consolidation elections, the voters of all the affected districts shall be entitled to vote;

If a majority of those voting in each district on the proposition favor the proposition, then it shall pass;

For enlargement elections, if the voters of the existing district have approved by election a mill levy to finance the operation of the district, then the voters of the area to be added shall also be required at the enlargement election to approve the same mill levy. If a majority of the voters in the area to be added voting on the proposition fails to approve the mill levy, then the enlargement, whether or not approved under paragraph (iii) of this subsection, shall fail. This paragraph shall not apply to an enlargement in which no election is required under W.S. 22-29-301(a);

For merger and consolidation elections, if the voters of an existing district have approved by election a mill levy to finance the operations of the district and the other district has no mill levy or a lower mill levy, the voters of that other district shall also be required at the merger or consolidation election to approve a mill levy at the same level as the existing district or increase an existing mill levy to the same level as the existing district. If a majority of the voters in the other district voting on the proposition fails to approve or increase the mill levy as required, then the merger or consolidation, whether or not approved under paragraph (iii) of this subsection, shall fail.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 2001, ch. 130, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

§ 22-29-306.
Rights of creditors after change of organization; enforcement.

No change of organization, or any term or condition thereof, shall impair the rights of any bondholder or other creditor of a district. Every bondholder or other creditor may enforce all the rights of the bondholder or other creditor in the same manner and to the same extent as if the change of organization, term or condition had not been made. Any of these rights may also be enforced against agencies, and their respective officers, as follows:

Upon enlargement of the territory, against the district to or from which the territory is enlarged;

Upon dissolution of a district, against the successor city, county or district or against a city, county or district receiving distribution of all or any part of the remaining assets of the dissolved district;

Upon merger of two (2) or more districts, against the surviving district;

Upon consolidation of two (2) or more districts, against the successor district.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-29-307.
Change in boundaries of districts; exclusion of property from district.

Any owner of property that is subject to assessment and payment of tax by a special district, but who is precluded by applicable state or federal law, rule or regulation from using the services provided by the district, may file with the board of county commissioners a petition praying that such lands be excluded from assessment by said district. Petitions shall describe the property which the petitioners desire to have excluded. Such petition must be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the exclusion proceedings. The county commissioners shall cause a notice of filing of such petition to be published, which notice shall state the filing of such petition, the name of petitioners, description of the property mentioned in said petition, and the prayer of said petitioners; and it shall notify all persons interested to appear at the office of said board at the time named in said notice, showing cause in writing, if any they have, why said petition should not be granted. The board at the time and place mentioned in the notice, or at the times to which the hearing of said petition may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto, presented in writing by any person showing cause why the prayer of the petition should not be granted. The filing by such petition shall be deemed and taken as an assent by each and all such petitioners to the exclusion from the district of the property mentioned in the petition or any part thereof. The exclusion shall be allowed if an owner of assessed property is precluded by applicable state or federal law, rule, or regulation from using the services provided by the district. This section shall be applicable only to petitions filed in accordance with the provisions of this section on or before March 31, 1999.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 1.

Operability. —

Although a board of county commissioners had authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 41-10-103(b),

41-10-120

to remove property from a water and sewer district, the lapse or sunsetting of this section left no statutory procedure available for doing so; thus, an owner's petition objecting to the inclusion of its property, filed after March 31, 1999, was properly dismissed.
Mt. Cement Co. v. S. of Laramie Water & Sewer Dist., 2011 WY 81, 255 P.3d 881,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2011).